Utah statutes.
78B-6-1235.   Allowance on purchase price -- When interested party is purchaser.

If a party entitled to a share of the property, or a lienholder entitled to have his lien paid out of the sale, becomes a purchaser, the referees may take his receipt for so much of the proceeds of the sale as belongs to him.

